Massachusetts, session 194th, H4877.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 17 of chapter 138 of the General
Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, the licensing authority of the Town of
Raynham may grant one (1) license for the sale of all alcoholic beverages not to be drunk on the
premises, under provisions of section 15 of said chapter 138. License shall be located at 1348
New State Highway, US-44. Such license shall be subject to all of the provisions of said chapter
138 within one year after the date of issuance of such license by said licensing authority and the
licenses must remain in the established district; and provided further, that such use is allowed by
right or by special permit in such applicable zoning district.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1